Missouri, session 2026, SB1804.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 324.049, to read as
follows:
324.049. 1. The board of registration for the healing
arts, the Missouri dental board, the board of nursing, and
the board of pharmacy shall not grant any regulatory
mitigation or waive or modify any rules related to
dispensing, prescribing, including prescription renewals,
administering, or otherwise distributing medications or
controlled substances to a person or business developing,
creating, or generating artificial intelligence for the use
of dispensing, prescribing, including prescription renewals,
administering, or otherwise distributing medications or
controlled substances.
2. As used in this section, the term "artificial
intelligence" means an artificial intelligence technology
system that:
(1) Is trained on data;
(2) Is designed to simulate human conversation with a
consumer through text, audio, or visual communication; and

SB 1804 2
(3) Generates nonscripted outputs similar to outputs
created by a human, with limited or no human oversight.
✓